Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 309, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 309. The Legislature shall conduct open meetings in


accordance with rules to be adopted by each house thereof.


Provided, however, the Legislature shall not prevent any person from


audio or video recording public meetings.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3203 BLB 1/15/2026 8:21:49 AM







Req. No. 3203 Page 1